Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5496.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1. This act may be cited as the "wireless communications device excise tax act". Sec. 2. As used in this act: (a) "Basic telephone" means a device primarily used for voice calling that cannot support third-party applications, except those preinstalled, and does not support access to internet platforms via applications or web browsers. (b) "Department" means the department of treasury. (c) "Excise tax" means the excise tax imposed under this act. (d) "Purchase price" means that term as defined in section 2 of the use tax act, MCL 205.92. (e) "Use tax act" means the use tax act, 1937 PA 94, MCL 205.91 to 205.111. (f) "Wireless communications device" means an electronic device capable of, but not limited to, text messaging, voice communication, entertainment, navigation, accessing the internet, sending and receiving photos and videos, or producing email. Wireless communications device does not include a basic telephone. Sec. 3. (1) Beginning on and after January 1, 2026, an excise tax is imposed on the retail sale in this state of a wireless communications device intended for the primary use of an individual who is under 18 years of age. (2) The rate of the excise tax is 32% of the purchase price. (3) The purchaser is liable for the excise tax on the transaction. Sec. 4. (1) The excise tax must be collected at the same time and in the same manner as the tax imposed under the use tax act. (2) The department shall administer the excise tax imposed by this act pursuant to 1941 PA 122, MCL 205.1 to 205.31, and this act. If 1941 PA 122, MCL 205.1 to 205.31, and this act conflict, this act applies. (3) The department shall prescribe the forms necessary for the administration of this act and may promulgate rules to implement this act pursuant to the administrative procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.201 to 24.328. Sec. 5. All excise taxes, penalties, and costs paid to the department under this act must be paid into the state treasury and credited to the children's mental health and safety fund created under section 6. Sec. 6. (1) The children's mental health and safety fund is created in the state treasury. (2) The state treasurer shall deposit money and other assets received under section 5 or from any other source in the children's mental health and safety fund. The state treasurer shall direct the investment of money in the children's mental health and safety fund and credit interest and earnings from the investments to the children's mental health and safety fund. (3) Money in the children's mental health and safety fund at the close of the fiscal year remains in the children's mental health and safety fund and does not lapse to the general fund. (4) The department is the administrator of the children's mental health and safety fund for audits of the fund. (5) The department shall expend money from the children's mental health and safety fund, on appropriation, only for 1 or more of the following purposes: (a) The administration of this act. (b) To support activities aimed at improving the mental health and safety of children as described in section 31aa of the state school aid act of 1979, 1979 PA 94, MCL 388.1631aa.